Massachusetts, session 194th, H959.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby by adding the following definitions:-
“Continuous automated sampling system” means the total equipment and procedures for
automated sample collection, sample recovery and analysis to determine an air contaminant
concentration or emission rate by collecting a single sample or multiple integrated samples of the
air contaminant for subsequent on- or off-site analysis.
“Continuous emissions monitoring system” means a monitoring system for continuously
measuring the emissions of an air contaminant from an incinerator.
“Dioxin/furan” means tetra- through octa-chlorinated dibenzo-p-dioxins and
dibenzofurans.
of 3

“Hospital, medical or infectious waste” means hospital waste or medical/infectious waste,
as defined in any general law or regulation in effect on the effective date of this act.
“Municipal solid waste incinerator” means any facility operated before, on or after the
effective date of this act for the purpose of combusting municipal solid waste, regardless of
whether the facility is later reclassified as another type of waste combustion facility.
SECTION 2. (a) Section 150A of said chapter 111 of the General Laws, as so appearing
is amended by adding the following:-
“The owner or operator of a municipal solid waste incinerator shall develop a plan to
continuously monitor or sample emissions of the following: carbon monoxide and sulfur dioxide
and nitrogen oxides and opacity and PCB and dioxin/furan and cadmium and lead and mercury
and arsenic and total chromium and manganese and nickel and selenium and zinc.
(b) Where technologically feasible, the plan must provide for the use of a continuous
emissions monitoring system to monitor the air contaminants described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(c) If it is not technologically feasible to use a continuous emissions monitoring system to
monitor an air contaminant described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the plan must provide
for the use of a continuous automated sampling system to continuously sample that air
contaminant.”
(d) The plan must describe how the owner or operator will conduct continuous
monitoring or sampling required by this section for a period of 12 consecutive months; and make
emissions data available to the department and the public.”
of 3

(e) The owner or operator of a municipal solid waste facility must submit the plan
required by this section to the department no later than three months after the effective date of
this act. Before approving the plan, the department may make such modifications to the plan as
necessary to ensure the quality and accuracy of sampling or monitoring data.
(f) The owner or operator of a municipal solid waste incinerator must implement a plan
approved by the department no later than three months after the date of approval.”
(g) Notwithstanding subsection (e) of this section, the department may at the
department’s discretion, for good cause shown, extend the three-month deadlines for submitting
or implementing the plan required by this section.”
(h) A municipal solid waste incinerator may not combust more than 18,000 tons of
hospital, medical or infectious waste during a single calendar year.
(i) The department shall take all reasonable steps to ensure that any permit issued under
the federal operating permit program established under is modified to be consistent with section
3 of this act within 12 months of the effective date of this act.
(j) No later than one year after the effective date of this act, the department shall submit a
report on the progress made in implementing section 2 of this act, including data received by the
department, in the manner provided in regulation.
(k) No later than three months after the completion of the 12-month period required by
section 2 of this act, the department shall submit a report on the results of the continuous
monitoring or sampling conducted under section 2 of this act, in the manner provided in
regulation.”
of 3